src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON ACTORTVderDAHTTE  
+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:Y6 ACTORCmp ;
+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:Y6 ACTORILL ;
+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:Y6 NE-EVENCASE ;
+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:Y6 DAGI_PLURAL ;
+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:Y6 DAGI_SINGULAR ;
                        
     +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Sg+Gen:Y6    K-VOW  ;
     +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Sg+Acc:Y6v   K-CONS ;
     +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Sg+Ine:Y6n   K-CONS ;
     +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Sg+Ela:Y6s   K-CONS ;
     +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Pl+Nom:Y6    K-VOW  ;
     +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Pl+Gen:Y6j   K-CONS ;
     +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Pl+Acc:Y6jt  K-CONS ;
     +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Pl+Ill:Y6jda K-VOW  ;
     +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Pl+Ela:Y6js  K-CONS ;
     +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Pl+Com:Y6j   K-CONS ;
        +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Abe:Y6dak K-CONS ;
 +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Use/NG+Abe:Y6da  K-VOW  ;

          +Use/-Spell+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Pl+Ine:Y6jn   K-CONS        ; !bargadahttijn is common typo of bargadattijn, the NomAg Sg Com and Pl Ine are not very much in use, so these are not generated and not in speller.
          +Use/-Spell+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Sg+Com:Y6jn   K-CONS        ; !bargadahttijn is common typo of bargadattijn, the NomAg Sg Com and Pl Ine are not very much in use, so these are not generated and not in speller.


LEXICON ACTORILL
 +Sg+Ill:X4j   K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Ill:X4s%> PxCi   ; !

LEXICON ACTORdiehtet
! +A+Attr:%>   ATTR            ;
         :%>Q7 NE-EVENCASE     ;
         :%>Q7 ACTORILLdiehtet ;
         :%>Q7 N-EVENWEAKSTEM  ;
         :%>   ACTORCmp        ;

LEXICON ACTORILLdiehtet
 +Sg+Ill:X4j   K-CONS ;
 +Sg+Ill:X4s%> PxCi   ; !

LEXICON BOAHTEM
         +N+Sg+Nom:%>   K-CONS              ;
      +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>   R                   ;
      +N+Cmp/SgGen:%>a  R                   ;
      +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij R                   ;
                +N:%>   OTH-ODDCASE_Px_flag ;
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes:»    AHTES               ;

LEXICON BOAHTEMTV  !+CmpN/SgN   +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
         +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Sg+Nom:%>   K-CONS              ;
      +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Cmp/SgNom:%>   R                   ;
      +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Cmp/SgGen:%>a  R                   ;
      +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij R                   ;
                +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:%>   OTH-ODDCASE_Px_flag ;
 +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Der4+Der/ahtes:»    AHTES               ;

LEXICON BASSALASSTEM
         +N+Sg+Nom:%>   K-CONS      ;
      +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>   R           ; !no compounds for these, but reintroduced
      +N+Cmp/SgGen:%>a  R           ;
      +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij R           ;
                +N:%>   OTH-ODDCASE ;
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes:»    AHTES       ;

LEXICON BASSALASSTEMTV  !+CmpN/SgN   +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
         +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Sg+Nom:%>   K-CONS              ;
      +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Cmp/SgNom:%>   R                   ;
      +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Cmp/SgGen:%>a  R                   ;
      +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij R                   ;
                +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:%>   OTH-ODDCASE_Px_flag ;
 +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Der4+Der/ahtes:»    AHTES               ;


LEXICON OADDÁM
         +N+Sg+Nom:%>   K-CONS      ;
      +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>   R           ; !no compounds for these, but reintroduced
      +N+Cmp/SgGen:%>a  R           ;
      +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij R           ;
                +N:%>   OTH-ODDCASE ;
 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes:»    AHTES       ;

LEXICON TJUOLLÁM  !+CmpN/SgN   +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
         +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Sg+Nom:%>   K-CONS              ;
      +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Cmp/SgNom:%>   R                   ;
      +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Cmp/SgGen:%>a  R                   ;
      +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij R                   ;
                +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N:%>   OTH-ODDCASE_Px_flag ;
 +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+N+Der4+Der/ahtes:»    AHTES               ;

!LEXICON N-TODO
!+N+TODO+Use/-Spell:0 # ;
