src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
diehtte+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Hum:diehtte ACTORdiehtet ; !
gielladiehtte+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:giella#diehtte ACTORdiehtet ;
gájkdiehtte+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gájk#diehtte ACTORdiehtet ;
sebrudakdiehtte+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sebrudak#diehtte ACTORdiehtet ;
stáhtadiehtte+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:stáhta#diehtte ACTORdiehtet ;
ássjediehtte+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ássje#diehtte ACTORdiehtet ;
